Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3024.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-12-25 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-12 entitled "Department
of Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-12-25. Childcare training, accreditation, technical assistance, and monitoring.
(a) The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the department of human services
such funds as it deems necessary to enable the department to assist providers in obtaining national
accreditation, to expand childcare staff development and training, and for technical assistance and
monitoring, including but not limited to, activities that provide:
(1) Training opportunities for childcare providers which foster a coordinated link between
the providers and the schools;
(2) Specialized training for providers of infant/toddler and/or pre-adolescent care;
(3) Evaluation of childcare providers and programs through parent surveys and formal
evaluation techniques;
(4) Technical assistance and training for current and prospective non-English speaking
providers.
(b) The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the department of human services
funding for the hiring of additional state childcare licensing inspectors in order to meet the National
Association for Regulatory Administration (NARA) recommended average of one inspector for
every fifty (50) to sixty (60) childcare providers.

(b)(c) The director of the department of human services is further authorized to request
such appropriation for each state fiscal year as the director deems necessary to carry out the
programs and purposes of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006014
========
LC006014 - Page 2 of 3